District of Columbia statutes.
25-312

Defining size of area relevant to determination of appropriateness.

(a)

The Board shall determine, on a case-by-case basis, whether the locality, section, or portion proposed by the applicant is a competent measure for determining the appropriateness of the establishment and, if not, shall identify the proper boundaries of the locality, section, or portion for evaluating the application. In making this determination, the Board shall consider the overall characteristics of the area, including population, density, and general commercial and residential activities.

(b)

In establishing any geographic boundaries required by this title, the Board shall measure the specified distance in an arc from each corner of the lot or parcel on which the establishment is located, connecting the arcs by tangent lines.

(c)

If the Board is required to state the distance between one or more places, (such as the actual distance of one licensed establishment from another or the actual distance of a licensed establishment from a school), the distance shall be measured linearly and shall be the shortest distance between the property lines of the places.

(d)

If a boundary line measured by the Board touches upon any portion of a parcel or lot, the parcel or lot shall be within the area being identified by the Board.

(e)

In submitting evidence of appropriateness, the applicant shall propose the boundaries of the locality, section, or portion to be considered.

(f)

Any person may submit written objections to the boundaries proposed by the applicant or a written proposal listing alternative boundaries for consideration by the Board.

History

Jan. 24, 1934, 48 Stat. 327, ch. 4, § 14
Aug. 25, 1937, 50 Stat. 802, 803, ch. 766, §§ 1, 2
June 15, 1938, 52 Stat. 691, ch. 396, § 3
June 29, 1953, 67 Stat. 103, ch. 159, § 404(e), (f)
Aug. 2, 1968, 82 Stat. 616, Pub. L. 90-450, title IV, § 404
Mar. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 3-146, § 4, 27 DCR 4753
Sept. 29, 1982, D.C. Law 4-157, §§ 8, 15, 29 DCR 3617
Mar. 8, 1984, D.C. Law 5-51, § 2(b)(4), (c), 30 DCR 5927
June 29, 1984, D.C. Law 5-97, § 2, 31 DCR 2556
Mar. 7, 1987, D.C. Law 6-217, § 9, 34 DCR 907
June 5, 1987, D.C. Law 7-7, § 2, 34 DCR 2640
Oct. 3, 1992, D.C. Law 9-174, § 2(b), (c), 39 DCR 5859
May 24, 1994, D.C. Law 10-122, § 2(f), 41 DCR 1658
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 2003(q)(2), 46 DCR 3142
Oct. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 13-39, § 2, 46 DCR 6548
May 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-298, § 101, 48 DCR 2959

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 25-312.
1973 Ed., § 25-115.